Alabama, session 2026rs, HB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
The following Section 93.19 is added to the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to read as follows:
Page 1

Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to read as follows:
HB549 INTRODUCED
The Alabama Department of Commerce is authorized to
provide low-interest loans to Alabama automotive manufacturers
or suppliers operating in the State of Alabama as part of the
Automotive Supply Chain Resilience and Expansion Act.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to authorize the Alabama Department of Commerce to
provide low-interest loans to Alabama automotive manufacturers
or suppliers operating in the State of Alabama as part of the
Automotive Supply Chain Resilience and Expansion Act.
Proposed by Act ____."
Page 2

Proposed by Act ____."
HB549 INTRODUCED
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3